Utah statutes.
63B-6-404.   Manner of issuance -- Amounts, interest, and maturity.

(1)  Bonds issued under this chapter may be authorized, sold, and issued at times and in a manner determined by the commission by resolution.

(2)  Bonds may be issued in one or more series, in amounts, and shall bear dates, interest rate or rates, including a variable rate, and maturity dates as the commission determines by resolution.

(3)  A bond issued may not mature later than 20 years after the date of final passage of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 391, 1997 General Session

